test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kosja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - кося: # Noun 'boat'
     кося+N+Sg+Nom: кося
     кося+N+Sg+Lat: косяа
     кося+N+Sg+Loc: косяӑн
#
     кося+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: косяем
     кося+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat: косяема
     кося+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc: косяемӑн
#
     кося+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: косяен
     кося+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat: косяена
     кося+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc: косяенӑн
#
     кося+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: косялд
     кося+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat: косялда
     кося+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc: косялдӑн
#
     кося+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: косяемӑн
     кося+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat: косяемӑна
     кося+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc: косяемӑнӑн
#
     кося+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: косяӑн
     кося+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat: косяӑна
     кося+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc: косяӑнӑн
#
     кося+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: косяӑн
     кося+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat: косяӑна
     кося+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc: косяӑнӑн
#
     кося+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: косяев
     кося+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat: косяева
     кося+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc: косяевӑн
#
     кося+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: косяӑн
     кося+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat: косяӑна
     кося+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc: косяӑнӑн
#
     кося+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: косяӑлд
     кося+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat: косяӑлда
     кося+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc: косяӑлдӑн
#
     кося+N+Du+Nom: косяңӑн
     кося+N+Du+Lat: косяңӑна
     кося+N+Du+Loc: косяңӑнӑн
#
     кося+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom: косяңӑлдам
     кося+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat: косяңӑлдама
     кося+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc: косяңӑлдамӑн
#
     кося+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom: косяңӑлдан
     кося+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat: косяңӑлдана
     кося+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc: косяңӑлданӑн
#
     кося+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom: косяңӑлдалд
     кося+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat: косяңӑлдалда
     кося+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc: косяңӑлдалдӑн

#
     кося+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom: косяңӑлдӑмӑн
     кося+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat: косяңӑлдӑмӑна
     кося+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc: косяңӑлдӑмӑнӑн
#
     кося+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom: косяңӑлдӑн
     кося+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat: косяңӑлдӑна
     кося+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc: косяңӑлдӑнӑн
#
     кося+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom: косяңӑлдалд
     кося+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat: косяңӑлдалда
     кося+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc: косяңӑлдалдӑн
#
     кося+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom: косяңӑлдув
     кося+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat: косяңӑлдува
     кося+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc: косяңӑлдувӑн
#
     кося+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom: косяңӑлдӑн
     кося+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat: косяңӑлдӑна
     кося+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc: косяңӑлдӑнӑн
#
     кося+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom: косяңӑлдалд
     кося+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat: косяңӑлдалда
     кося+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc: косяңӑлдалдӑн
#
     кося+N+Pl+Nom: косяӑт
     кося+N+Pl+Lat: косяӑта
     кося+N+Pl+Loc: косяӑтӑн

     кося+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: косялдам
     кося+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: косялдама
     кося+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc: косялдамӑн

     кося+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: косялдан
     кося+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: косялдана
     кося+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc: косялданӑн

     кося+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: косялдалд
     кося+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat: косялдалда
     кося+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc: косялдалдӑн


     кося+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom: косялдӑмӑн
     кося+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat: косялдӑмӑна
     кося+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc: косялдӑмӑнӑн

     кося+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom: косялдӑн
     кося+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat: косялдӑна
     кося+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc: косялдӑнӑн

     кося+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom: косялдалд
     кося+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat: косялдалда
     кося+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc: косялдалдӑн

     кося+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: косялдув
     кося+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat: косялдува
     кося+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc: косялдувӑн

     кося+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: косялдӑн
     кося+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat: косялдӑна
     кося+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc: косялдӑнӑн

     кося+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: косялдалд
     кося+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat: косялдалда
     кося+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc: косялдалдӑн
